Massachusetts, session 194th, H4293.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 53 of chapter 44 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the town of Hopkinton shall establish in the town
treasury a special revenue account to be known as the Economic Development Special Revenue
Fund, into which shall be deposited certain receipts comprised of the total local meals tax
received annually by the town under subsections (b) and (c) of section 2 of chapter 64L of the
General Laws. The fund shall be used to support economic development projects, activities,
operations and administration in the town of Hopkinton, including those that stimulate economic
growth, attract and retain businesses, and improve infrastructure.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the amount of the local
meals tax collected under said section 2 of said chapter 64L by the town for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter shall be credited to the Economic
of 3

Development Special Revenue Fund and shall be subject to further appropriation by a majority
vote of the town meeting.
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any interest accruing on
any amount on deposit in the Economic Development Special Revenue Fund shall be credited to
the general fund of the town of Hopkinton.
(d) Nothing in this act shall affect amounts distributed in any fiscal year to the town from
the Local Aid Fund.
(e) If, by a majority vote of the town meeting pursuant to section 4B of chapter 4 of the
General Laws, the town revokes its acceptance of the local meals tax collected under said section
2 of said chapter 64L, the town shall decide by a 2/3 vote of the town meeting whether the
Economic Development Special Revenue Fund shall cease to have effect. If 2/3 of the town
meeting votes that the Economic Development Special Revenue Fund shall cease to have effect,
all unexpended and uncommitted amounts on deposit in the Economic Development Special
Revenue Fund as of the date of the vote to revoke the local meals tax shall be credited to the
general fund of the town on the first day of the calendar quarter following 30 days after the date
of the revocatory vote; provided, however, that if 2/3 of the town meeting does not vote that the
Economic Development Special Revenue Fund shall cease to have effect, the Economic
Development Special Revenue Fund shall continue to have effect and all unexpended and
uncommitted amounts on deposit in the Economic Development Special Revenue Fund as of the
date of the vote to revoke the local meals tax collected under said section 2 of said chapter 64L
shall be subject to further appropriation by a majority vote of the town meeting.
of 3

(f) The town may vote to close the Economic Development Special Revenue Fund by a
2/3 vote of the town meeting. The vote to close the Economic Development Special Revenue
Fund shall designate: (i) that the Economic Development Special Revenue Fund shall cease to
have effect; (ii) that all unexpended and uncommitted amounts on deposit in the Economic
Development Special Revenue Fund as of the date of the vote shall immediately be credited to
the general fund of the town; and (iii) that the local meals tax that is received annually by the
town under said section 2 of said chapter 64L and credited to the Economic Development
Special Revenue Fund as set forth in subsections (b) and (c) shall be credited to the general fund
of the town.
SECTION 2. The treasurer of the town of Hopklnton shall, until such time as the
Economic Development Special Revenue Fund ceases to exist, provide an annual financial report
to the town, which shall be publicly posted on or before October 1 of each year. The annual
financial report shall specifically include: (i) fund revenues; (ii) fund receipts; (iii) the amount of
grants made from the fund; (iv) the specific amounts of loans made by the find and to whom
such loans were made; and (v) the balance of money in the fund at the end of each fiscal year.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3